fr: graisse de porc
hr: svinjsko masno
pt: gordura de suíno, gorduras de suíno, lípido de suíno, lípidos de suíno
ro: grăsime de porc, grasime de porc

fr: sang de porc
fi: sian veri
sv: svin blod, blod av svin

en: pork loin
bg: свинско филе, свинско контрафиле
ca: Llom de porc
de: Schweinelende
es: Lomo de cerdo
eu: txerri-solomo
fr: longe de porc
gl: lombo de porco
hr: svinjski but, svinjsko meso od buta
it: lonza di maiale
ko: 등심
pl: schab wieprzowy
pt: lombo
ru: корейка
zh: 猪里脊

en: raw pork loin
fr: longue de porc crue
hr: sirovi lungić
it: lombo di maiale crudo

en: Cooked pork loin
fr: Longe de porc cuite
hr: kuhani lungić
it: lombo di maiale cotto

en: Pork knuckle, Pork shank
fr: jarret de porc, jarrets de porc
hr: svinjska koljenica
it: stinco di maiale
pl: golonka wieprzowa

en: pork leg
bg: свински бут, свинско месо от бут
de: Schweinekeule, Schweineschenkel
fr: cuisse de porc
hr: svinjska noga
it: coscia di suino, coscia suina

bg: свинско месо от врат
fr: gorge de porc

en: pork stock, pork broth
bg: свински бульон
cs: vývar z vepřového masa, vepřový vývar
de: Schweinefleischbrühe
es: caldo de cerdo
fr: bouillon de porc
hr: svinjski temeljac
it: brodo di maiale
ja: ポークブイヨン

en: pork bone
de: Schweineknochen
es: hueso de cerdo
fr: os de porc
hr: svinjska kost
it: osso di maiale

en: pork liver
bg: свински черен дроб
ca: fetge de porc
cs: vepřová játra
da: svinelever
de: Schweineleber
eo: porka hepataĵo
es: higado de cerdo, tocino de hígado de cerdo
fi: sianmaksa
fr: foie de porc
hr: svinjska jetra
hu: sertésmáj
id: hati babi
it: fegato di maiale
ja: 豚肝臓
nl: varkenslever
no: svinelever
pl: wątroba wieprzowa
ro: ficat de porc, ficat porc
ru: Свиная печень, печень свиная
sl: svinjska jetra
sv: Grislever
zh: 猪肝

en: pork belly, pork bellies
bg: свинско шкембе
da: Slag
de: Schweinebauch
el: χοιρινό στήθος
eo: porkventraĵo
es: panza de cerdo
fi: porsaankylki
fr: ventre de porc
ga: bolg muiceola
hr: svinjska potrbušina
hu: császárszalonna
it: pancetta di maiale
ja: ポークベリー
jv: weteng babi
ko: 삼겹살
nl: varkensbuik, buikspek
ru: пашина
sv: sidfläsk
vi: thịt ba chỉ
zh: 豬腩

en: british pork belly
de: britischer Schweinebauch
hr: britanska svinjska potrbušina
it: pancetta di maiale britannica

en: smoked pork belly
ca: cansalda de por fumat
es: panceta de cerdo ahumada, panceta ahumada de cerdo
fr: poitrine de porc fumée
hr: dimljena svinjska potrbušina
nl: gerookt varkensbuik

en: breast
bg: гърди
da: Bryst
de: Brustfleisch
es: Pechuga
fi: Rinta
fr: poitrine
hr: grudi
it: Petto
nl: borst

en: smoked breast
bg: пушени гърди
de: Geräuchertes Brustfleisch
fr: poitrine fumée
hr: dimljena prsa
it: petto affumicato

en: pork breast
bg: свински гърди
da: brystflæsk
de: Schweinebrust
es: panceta de cerdo
fi: Porsaan rinta
fr: poitrine de porc
hr: svinjska prsa
it: Petto di maiale
nl: Varkens borst
ro: piept de porc, piet porc

en: dehydrated pork broth, pork stock powder
de: getrocknete Schweinebrühe, getrocknete Schweinefleischbrühe
fr: bouillon de porc déshydraté
hr: dehidrirana svinjska juha
it: brodo di maiale disidratato

en: pork fillet, pork tenderloin
da: svinemørbrad
de: Schweinefilet
fi: porsaanfilee, porsaan sisäfilee
fr: filet de porc
hr: svinjski file
id: Babi has dalam
it: filetto di maiale
jv: Babi has jero
pl: Polędwiczka
sv: ytterfilé av gris, fläskfilé
vi: Nạc thăn
zh: 豬柳

en: raw lean pork tenderloin
fr: filet de porc cru
hr: sirovi nemasni svinjski file
it: filetto di maiale magro crudo